src/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc
!! Pronoun inflection
!! Khanty

LEXICON PronRoot
ма+Pers+Pron+1Sg+Nom:ма K "I / minä" ;
нӑӊ+Pers+Pron+2Sg+Nom:нӑӊ K "you (sg.) / sinä" ;
ӆув+Pers+Pron+3Sg+Nom:ӆув K "he, she, it / hän, se" ;
мыӊ+Pers+Pron+1Pl+Nom:мыӊ K "we / me" ;
нын+Pers+Pron+2Pl+Nom:нын K "you (pl.) / te" ;
ӆыв+Pers+Pron+3Pl+Nom:ӆыв K "they / he, ne" ;

ма+Pers+Pron+1Sg+Acc:мӑнєт K ;
ма+Pers+Pron+1Sg+Dat:мӑнєм K ;
нӑӊ+Pers+Pron+2Sg+Acc:нӑӊти K ;

!!DEM
тӑм+Dem+Prox+Attr:тӑм K ;
тум+Dem+Distl+Pron+Nom:тум K ;
ҫи+Dem+Anaph+Pron+Nom:ҫи K ;
тӑм+Dem+Prox+Pron+Nom:тӑми K ;
тум+Dem+Distl+Pron+Nom:туми K ;
ҫи+Dem+Anaph+Pron+Nom:ҫит K ;

тӑм+Dem+Prox+Pron+Lat:тив K ;
тум+Dem+Distl+Pron+Lat:тухи K ;
ҫи+Dem+Anaph+Pron+Lat:ҫив K ;
тӑм+Dem+Prox+Pron+Lat:тивӑӆт K ;
тум+Dem+Distl+Pron+Lat:тухӑӆт K ;
ҫи+Dem+Anaph+Pron+Lat:ҫивӑӆт K ;

тӑм+Dem+Prox+Pron+Loc:тӑта K ;
тум+Dem+Distl+Pron+Loc:тута K ;
ҫи+Dem+Anaph+Pron+Loc:ҫӑта K ;

тӑм+Dem+Prox+Pron+Abl:тӑӆта K ;
тум+Dem+Distl+Pron+Abl:туӆта K ;
ҫи+Dem+Anaph+Pron+Abl:ҫӑӆта K ;

!!

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
