src/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON pronouns

нӑӊ:нӑӊ PronTag  "" ;
ма:ма PronTag  "I" ;
ӆув:ӆув PronTag  "he" ;
ӆыв:ӆыв PronTag  "they" ;
мыӊ:мыӊ PronTag  "we" ;
нын:нын PronTag  "" ;
